Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-303 Law governing perfection and
priority of security interests in goods covered by a certificate of title. (a)
This section applies to goods covered by a certificate of title, even if there
is no other relationship between the jurisdiction under whose certificate of
title the goods are covered and the goods or the debtor.

(b) Goods become covered by a certificate of
title when a valid application for the certificate of title and the applicable
fee are delivered to the appropriate authority. Goods cease to be covered by a
certificate of title at the earlier of the time the certificate of title ceases
to be effective under the law of the issuing jurisdiction or the time the goods
become covered subsequently by a certificate of title issued by another
jurisdiction.

(c) The local law of the jurisdiction under
whose certificate of title the goods are covered governs perfection, the effect
of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in
goods covered by a certificate of title from the time the goods become covered
by the certificate of title until the goods cease to be covered by the
certificate of title. [L 2000, c 241, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next